apertium-mos.mos.dix
		<pardef n="gãee/nga__n">
			<e>       <p><l>nga</l>        <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ng</l>        <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ngã</l>        <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ms</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>mse</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>mse</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>msã</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>msã</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ns</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>nse</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>nse</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>nsã</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>nsã</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>		
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="sõor/e__n">
			<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- bronchite -->
			<e r="LR"><p><l></l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gãnda/oogo__n">
			<e>       <p><l>oog</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogo</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogã</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ado</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ad</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gãngã/oogo__n">
			<e>       <p><l>oog</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogo</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogã</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ado</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ad</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gãn/go__n">
			<e>       <p><l>g</l>      <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>go</l>      <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>gã</l>      <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>do</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>dã</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>dã</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gãob/go__n">
			<e>       <p><l>g</l>      <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>go</l>      <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>gã</l>      <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>do</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>dã</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>dã</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gãon/go__n">
			<e>       <p><l>g</l>      <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>go</l>      <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>gã</l>      <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>do</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>dã</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>dã</l>       <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="geos/go__n">
			<e>       <p><l>go</l>        <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ge/re__n">
			<e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>r</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>rã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ya</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ya</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>yã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>yã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>wã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>wã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gĩin/di__n">
			<e>       <p><l>di</l>        <r>di<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>di<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>di<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>di<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>na</l>        <r>di<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>nã</l>        <r>di<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>nã</l>        <r>di<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gin/da__n">
			<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>dba</l>       <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>db</l>       <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>dbã</l>       <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>dbã</l>       <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gɩdgd/a__n">
			<e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ba</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>b</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>bã</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gɩdg/re__n">
			<e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>r</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>rã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gɩt/a__n">
			<e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ba</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>b</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>bã</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="gĩs/ga__n">
			<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

	<e lm="gãeenga">         <i>gãee</i><par n="gãee/nga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãndaoogo">       <i>gãnda</i><par n="gãnda/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãngãoogo">       <i>gãngã</i><par n="gãngã/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãngo">           <i>gãn</i><par n="gãn/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãobgo">          <i>gãob</i><par n="gãob/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãongo">          <i>gãon</i><par n="gãon/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="geosgo">          <i>geos</i><par n="geos/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gere">            <i>ge</i><par n="ge/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gĩindi">          <i>gĩin</i><par n="gĩin/di__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ginda">           <i>gin</i><par n="gin/da__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gĩsga">           <i>gĩs</i><par n="gĩs/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gɩdgda">          <i>gɩdgd</i><par n="gɩdgd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gɩdgre">          <i>gɩdg</i><par n="gɩdg/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gɩta">            <i>gɩt</i><par n="gɩt/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãeenga">         <i>gãee</i><par n="gãee/nga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãndaoogo">       <i>gãnda</i><par n="gãnda/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãngãoogo">       <i>gãngã</i><par n="gãngã/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãngo">           <i>gãn</i><par n="gãn/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãobgo">          <i>gãob</i><par n="gãob/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gãongo">          <i>gãon</i><par n="gãon/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="geosgo">          <i>geos</i><par n="geos/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gere">            <i>ge</i><par n="ge/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gĩindi">          <i>gĩin</i><par n="gĩin/di__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ginda">           <i>gin</i><par n="gin/da__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gĩsga">           <i>gĩs</i><par n="gĩs/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gɩdgda">          <i>gɩdgd</i><par n="gɩdgd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gɩdgre">          <i>gɩdg</i><par n="gɩdg/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="gɩta">            <i>gɩt</i><par n="gɩt/a__n"/></e>
